Colorado, session 2026A, SB170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-1-153 as
follows:
22-1-153. Access to opportunity task force - creation - members
- duties - report - definitions - repeal.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
CREATED AND EXISTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-1-115.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) "OPPORTUNITY GAPS" MEANS DISPARITIES IN STUDENTS' ACCESS
TO EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES AND DISPARITIES IN ACADEMIC OUTCOMES,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ACHIEVEMENT, GROWTH, GRADUATION
RATES, AND POSTSECONDARY READINESS, EXPERIENCED BY GROUPS OF
STUDENTS BASED ON FACTORS SUCH AS RACE, SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS,
GEOGRAPHY, DISABILITY STATUS, AND ENGLISH LEARNER STATUS. SUCH
DISPARITIES MAY BE INFLUENCED BY DIFFERENCES IN ACCESS TO NECESSARY
SUPPORTS INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE CLASSROOM, HIGH-QUALITY
INSTRUCTION, STABLE LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS, AND QUALIFIED
EDUCATORS, AS WELL AS BY SCHOOL, DISTRICT, AND STATE-LEVEL POLICIES
AND PRACTICES.
(c) "RURAL PUBLIC SCHOOL" MEANS A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN COLORADO
THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IS RURAL BASED ON THE GEOGRAPHIC
SIZE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL'S SCHOOL DISTRICT AND THE DISTANCE FROM
THE NEAREST LARGE, URBANIZED AREA, AND THE TOTAL STUDENT
ENROLLMENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IS SIX THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED OR
FEWER STUDENTS.
(d) "STATE BOARD" MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
CREATED AND EXISTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 1 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(2) THE ACCESS TO OPPORTUNITY TASK FORCE IS CREATED IN THE
DEPARTMENT TO STUDY HOW TO EXPAND ACCESS TO EFFECTIVE PUBLIC
SCHOOLS AND PRACTICES FOR EVERY COLORADO STUDENT.
(3) THE ACCESS TO OPPORTUNITY TASK FORCE CONSISTS OF MEMBERS
APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:
(a) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE BOARD;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATION WITH A FOCUS ON CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A METRO DENVER SCHOOL LEADER AT A
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-170

COLORADO PUBLIC SCHOOL WITH A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS EDUCATORS;
(b) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL
APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL LEADER AT A RURAL PUBLIC
SCHOOL;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS TEACHERS;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
PARENT ORGANIZATION THAT FOCUSES ON EDUCATION POLICY AND CLOSING
OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ORGANIZATION
THAT WORKS DIRECTLY WITH OR AT A FACILITY SCHOOL;
(c) THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES MINORITY LEADER SHALL
APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL LEADER AT A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN
SOUTHERN COLORADO WITH A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS SUPERINTENDENTS; AND
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL TEACHER IN A COLORADO
PUBLIC SCHOOL CLASSROOM WITH A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(d) THE SENATE MINORITY LEADER SHALL APPOINT THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-170

ORGANIZATION THAT FOCUSES ON EDUCATION POLICY AND CLOSING
OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS EDUCATORS WITH A PARTICULAR FOCUS
ON EDUCATION POLICY AND CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL LEADER AT A COLORADO
PUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS A COMMUNITY SCHOOL AS DEFINED IN SECTION
22-32.5-103 AND THAT HAS A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(e) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A STATEWIDE
ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS CHARTER SCHOOLS;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A SCHOOL LEADER AT A PUBLIC SCHOOL
IN NORTHERN COLORADO WITH A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A RECENT GRADUATE OF A COLORADO
PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL WITH A DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF
MEANINGFULLY NARROWING OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(f) THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, SHALL
APPOINT ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO FOCUSES ON
ADDRESSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS.
(4) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THEIR INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE TASK FORCE NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2026.
(5) EACH MEMBER OF THE TASK FORCE SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF
THEIR RESPECTIVE APPOINTING OFFICIAL. IF A TASK FORCE VACANCY
OCCURS, THE ORIGINAL APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL, WITHIN FOURTEEN
DAYS AFTER THE VACANCY, APPOINT A NEW TASK FORCE MEMBER WHO
SATISFIES THE MEMBERSHIP REQUIREMENTS OF THE VACATED SEAT.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-170

(6) TASK FORCE MEMBERS DO NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION OR
REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES.
(7) (a) THE TASK FORCE SHALL ALLOW FOR REMOTE PARTICIPATION
IN EACH MEETING OF THE TASK FORCE.
(b) THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, SHALL
CONVENE THE FIRST MEETING OF THE TASK FORCE NO LATER THAN ONE
MONTH AFTER THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, HAS
DETERMINED THAT THE TASK FORCE HAS RECEIVED AN AMOUNT OF GIFTS,
GRANTS, AND DONATIONS SUFFICIENT TO BEGIN ITS WORK DESCRIBED IN THIS
SECTION OR JULY 31, 2026, WHICHEVER IS LATER.
(c) AT OR BEFORE THE FIRST TASK FORCE MEETING, THE PRESIDENT
OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT THE TASK FORCE CHAIR AND THE SPEAKER
OF THE HOUSE SHALL APPOINT THE TASK FORCE VICE-CHAIR. THE CHAIR OF
THE TASK FORCE SHALL CONVENE THE TASK FORCE MEETINGS AFTER THE
FIRST MEETING. THE TASK FORCE SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES AND
SHALL COMPLETE ITS DUTIES NO LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2027.
(8) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT
THIRD-PARTY ENTITY TO FACILITATE TASK FORCE MEETINGS, ASSIST IN
CONDUCTING THE STUDY REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (10) OF THIS
SECTION, AND PREPARE A WRITTEN REPORT SUMMARIZING THE STUDY'S
FINDINGS AND THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE TASK FORCE ISSUED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (12) OF THIS SECTION. THE INDEPENDENT
THIRD-PARTY ENTITY MUST BE A PREAPPROVED VENDOR FROM THE
DEPARTMENT'S PRICE AGREEMENT LIST.
(9) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE INFORMATION AND STAFF
SUPPORT, OTHER THAN THE STAFF SUPPORT PROVIDED BY THE THIRD-PARTY
ENTITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (8) OF THIS SECTION, TO THE TASK FORCE
AND THIRD-PARTY ENTITY UPON THE REQUEST OF THE TASK FORCE CHAIR TO
THE EXTENT NECESSARY FOR THE TASK FORCE TO COMPLETE ITS DUTIES
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE THIRD
PARTY SECURE ACCESS TO DATA CURRENTLY COLLECTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO ALLOW THE THIRD PARTY TO COMPILE, ANALYZE, AND
PROVIDE TO THE TASK FORCE THE DATA NECESSARY TO CONSIDER THE
ISSUES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (10) OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-170

(10) THE STUDY CONDUCTED BY THE TASK FORCE MUST CONSIDER:
(a) THE CURRENT STATE OF OPPORTUNITY GAPS ACROSS COLORADO,
IDENTIFYING WHERE GAPS ARE GEOGRAPHICALLY MOST PREVALENT AND
PERSISTENT, AND THE DISAGGREGATED SUBGROUPS OF STUDENTS MOST
IMPACTED BY THE GAPS;
(b) THE COLORADO PUBLIC SCHOOLS AND DISTRICTS WITH A
DEMONSTRATED TRACK RECORD OF CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS BASED ON
ACADEMIC OUTCOMES AS A NECESSARY STARTING POINT, WITH THE
UNDERSTANDING THAT OPPORTUNITY GAPS ARE INFLUENCED BY MULTIPLE
FACTORS AND THAT THE TASK FORCE MAY CHOOSE TO CONSIDER
ADDITIONAL SOURCES OF DATA THAT EMPHASIZE STUDENT SUCCESS AND
WELL-BEING;
(c) THE PROGRAMS, STRATEGIES, PRACTICES, AND CONDITIONS,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT NECESSARILY LIMITED TO, CONDITIONS OF POLICY,
RESOURCE ALLOCATION, COMMUNITY INVOLVEMENT, SCHOOL PHILOSOPHY,
AND SCHOOL CLIMATE, OF THE SCHOOLS AND DISTRICTS IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (10)(b) OF THIS SECTION THAT MOST CONTRIBUTE TO SUCCESS
IN CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(d) THE NONFINANCIAL BARRIERS THAT PREVENT EFFECTIVE
SCHOOLS AND PRACTICES FROM BEING REPLICATED AND EXPANDED ACROSS
COLORADO AND WHAT POLICY CHANGES ARE NECESSARY TO REMOVE THOSE
BARRIERS WITHIN EXISTING RESOURCES;
(e) STATES AND NEW APPROACHES TO SCHOOLS AND SCHOOLING
THAT HAVE DEMONSTRATED PROMISE AND SUSTAINED PROGRESS IN CLOSING
OPPORTUNITY GAPS AND WHAT POLICIES AND PRACTICES HAVE ENABLED
THEM TO BE SUCCESSFUL IN CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS; AND
(f) HOW COLORADO CAN REDESIGN ITS EDUCATION SYSTEM TO
BETTER SUPPORT INNOVATION, CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT, AND
FUTURE-READY LEARNING MODELS WHILE MAINTAINING ACCOUNTABILITY
FOR ACADEMIC OUTCOMES.
(11) (a) THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS THAT THE COST
OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION IS FUNDED ENTIRELY BY GIFTS,
GRANTS, AND DONATIONS AND THAT FURTHER GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-170

DONATIONS CONTINUE THROUGHOUT THE COURSE OF THE STUDY. THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT APPROPRIATE MONEY FROM THE GENERAL
FUND FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ACCEPT AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR
DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION. THE TASK FORCE SHALL NOT IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION UNLESS THE
DEPARTMENT RECEIVES AN AMOUNT OF GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS
THAT THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION, OR THEIR DESIGNEE, DEEMS
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION. WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF A GIFT, GRANT, OR DONATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST ON
ITS WEBSITE THE SOURCE AND AMOUNT OF THE GIFT, GRANT, OR DONATION
RECEIVED IN SUPPORT OF THE TASK FORCE.
(c) THE STUDY AND WRITTEN REPORT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS
(10) AND (12) OF THIS SECTION ARE CONTINGENT ON MONEY BEING
AVAILABLE TO CARRY OUT THE STUDY AND THE WRITTEN REPORT. IF MONEY
IS NOT AVAILABLE FOR THE TASK FORCE OR FOR THE THIRD-PARTY ENTITY
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (8) OF THIS SECTION TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE TASK FORCE OR THE ENTITY IS
NOT REQUIRED TO CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES. A CONTRACT WITH A
THIRD-PARTY ENTITY CONTRACTED WITH PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (8) OF
THIS SECTION THAT PROVIDES SERVICES RELATED TO FACILITATION AND THE
STUDY AND WRITTEN REPORT IS CONTINGENT ON GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS BEING AVAILABLE FOR THAT PURPOSE.
(12) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE TASK FORCE SHALL
SUBMIT A WRITTEN REPORT WITH FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
EDUCATION COMMITTEES OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE
SENATE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES; THE GOVERNOR; THE STATE
BOARD; THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION; AND THE DEPARTMENT. THE
WRITTEN REPORT MUST INCLUDE A MINORITY REPORT IF ONE IS REQUESTED
BY A MEMBER OF THE TASK FORCE. IF THE FIRST MEETING OF THE TASK
FORCE IS NOT UNTIL AFTER JULY 31, 2026, THE DEADLINE TO COMPLETE THE
WRITTEN REPORT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE ADJUSTED
TO ALLOW FIVE MONTHS BETWEEN THE FIRST MEETING AND THE WRITTEN
REPORT DEADLINE.
(13) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-170

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-170